Montana, session 2025, SB24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 69-14-626, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-14-626. Prohibition on extended obstruction of highway crossings. (1) It shall be is unlawful
for any corporation, association, or company to willfully obstruct, blockade, interfere with, or prevent the free
use of any public highway within the state where such the highway crosses any railroad track outside of
incorporated cities and towns by stopping any railroad train, car, engine, or locomotive for more than 15
minutes at any one time or by placing, depositing, or leaving any article or thing whatsoever on any railroad
track at the point where any public highway crosses such the track outside of incorporated cities and towns.
(2) Any corporation, association, or company so obstructing, blockading, or interfering with the free
use of any such a highway shall be deemed as described in subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and,
upon on conviction, thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than $25 $750 or more than $100 $1,500.
This section shall may not be construed as repealing any existing laws prohibiting encroachments upon on or
obstruction of public highways."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 24